Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXVI Statutory Actions and Limitations
Product Liability Act

411.300.
Definitions.

As used in KRS

411.310

to

411.340

, a “product liability action” shall include any action brought for or on account of personal injury, death or property damage caused by or resulting from the manufacture, construction, design, formulation, development of standards, preparation, processing, assembly, testing, listing, certifying, warning, instructing, marketing, advertising, packaging or labeling of any product.

As used in KRS

411.310

to

411.340

, a “plaintiff” shall mean a person asserting a claim and, if said claim is asserted on behalf of an estate, “plaintiff” shall include plaintiff’s decedent.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 91, § 2, effective June 17, 1978.

411.310.
Presumptions in product liability actions.

In any product liability action, it shall be presumed, until rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence to the contrary, that the subject product was not defective if the injury, death or property damage occurred either more than five (5) years after the date of sale to the first consumer or more than eight (8) years after the date of manufacture.

In any product liability action, it shall be presumed, until rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence to the contrary, that the product was not defective if the design, methods of manufacture, and testing conformed to the generally recognized and prevailing standards or the state of the art in existence at the time the design was prepared, and the product was manufactured.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 91, § 3, effective June 17, 1978.

411.320.
Circumstances under which defendant is liable.

In any product liability action, a manufacturer shall be liable only for the personal injury, death or property damage that would have occurred if the product had been used in its original, unaltered and unmodified condition. For the purpose of this section, product alteration or modification shall include failure to observe routine care and maintenance, but shall not include ordinary wear and tear. This section shall apply to alterations or modifications made by any person or entity, except those made in accordance with specifications or instructions furnished by the manufacturer.

In any product liability action, if the plaintiff performed an unauthorized alteration or an unauthorized modification, and such alteration or modification was a substantial cause of the occurrence that caused injury or damage to the plaintiff, the defendant shall not be liable whether or not said defendant was at fault or the product was defective.

In any product liability action, if the plaintiff failed to exercise ordinary care in the circumstances in his use of the product, and such failure was a substantial cause of the occurrence that caused injury or damage to the plaintiff, the defendant shall not be liable whether or not said defendant was at fault or the product was defective.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 91, § 4, effective June 17, 1978.

411.330.
Admissibility of certain evidence. [Repealed.]

411.340.
When wholesaler, distributor or retailer to be held liable.

In any product liability action, if the manufacturer is identified and subject to the jurisdiction of the court, a wholesaler, distributor, or retailer who distributes or sells a product, upon his showing by a preponderance of the evidence that said product was sold by him in its original manufactured condition or package, or in the same condition such product was in when received by said wholesaler, distributor or retailer, shall not be liable to the plaintiff for damages arising solely from the distribution or sale of such product, unless such wholesaler, distributor or retailer, breached an express warranty or knew or should have known at the time of distribution or sale of such product that the product was in a defective condition, unreasonably dangerous to the user or consumer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 91, § 6, effective June 17, 1978.

411.350.
Short title.

KRS

411.300

to

411.340

shall be known as the “Product Liability Act of Kentucky.”

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 91, § 1, effective June 17, 1978.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Comments, The Liability of Cigarette Manufacturers for Lung Cancer: An Analysis of the Federal Cigarette Labeling and Advertising Act and Preemption of Strict Liability in Tort Against Cigarette Manufacturers, 76 Ky. L.J. 569 (1987-88).

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Phillips, Crashworthiness in the Commonwealth: An Analysis of the Defectiveness of Tractors Without Rops, 23 N. Ky. Rev. 325 (1996).

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, Prac. & Proc. Forms, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Products Liability, § 137.00.